Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2854.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 42-12-20 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-12 entitled "Department
of Human Services" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-12-20. Responsibility of director — Traumatic brain injury.
It shall be the responsibility of the director of the department of human services secretary
of the executive office of health and human services (EOHHS) to provide rehabilitative services
for persons with traumatic brain injury including the development of instate comprehensive
community-based services.
The department of human services executive office of health and human services
(EOHHS), in consultation with the permanent advisory commission on traumatic brain injuries,
shall promulgate such rules and regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedures Act,
chapter 35 of this title, as are necessary and proper to ensure responsible management and operation
of § 42-12-30.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005524
========